Utah statutes.
26-20-2.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Benefit" means the receipt of money, goods, or any other thing of
pecuniary value.
(2)  "Claim" means any request or demand for money or property:
(a)  made to any:
(i)  employee, officer, or agent of the state;
(ii)  contractor with the state; or
(iii)  grantee or other recipient, whether or not under contract with the
state; and
(b)  if:
(i)  any portion of the money or property requested or demanded was issued
from or provided by the state; or
(ii)  the state will reimburse the contractor, grantee, or other recipient for
any portion of the money or property.
(3)  "False statement" or "false representation" means a wholly or partially
untrue statement or representation which is:
(a)  knowingly made; and
(b)  a material fact with respect to the claim.
(4)  "Knowing" and "knowingly":
(a)  for purposes of criminal prosecutions for violations of this chapter, is
one of the culpable mental states described in Subsection 26-20-9(1); and
(b)  for purposes of civil prosecutions for violations of this chapter, is the
required culpable mental state as defined in Subsection 26-20-9.5(1).
(5)  "Medical benefit" means a benefit paid or payable to a recipient or a
provider under a program administered by the state under:
(a)  Titles V and XIX of the federal Social Security Act;
(b)  Title X of the federal Public Health Services Act;
(c)  the federal Child Nutrition Act of 1966 as amended by P.L. 94-105; and
(d)  any programs for medical assistance of the state.
(6)  "Person" means an individual, corporation, unincorporated association,
professional corporation, partnership, or other form of business association.
